Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.440

Plumbing contractor license—Permitting requirements.

(1) No city, town, or county shall issue a plumbing permit for work which is to be done by any contractor required to be licensed under this chapter without verification that such contractor is currently licensed as required by law. When such verification is made, nothing contained in this section is intended to be, nor shall be construed to create, or form the basis for any liability under this chapter on the part of any city, town, or county, or its officers, employees, or agents.

(2) At the time of issuing the plumbing permit, all cities, towns, or counties are responsible for:

(a) Printing the plumbing contractor license number on the plumbing permit; and

(b) Providing a written notice to the plumbing permit applicant informing them of plumbing contractor license laws and the potential risk and monetary liability to the homeowner for using an unlicensed plumbing contractor.

(3) If a plumbing permit is obtained by an applicant or contractor who falsifies information to obtain an exemption provided under RCW 18.106.150 the plumbing permit shall be forfeited.

[ 2020 c 153 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 153 ss 21, 22, and 28: See note following RCW 18.27.060.